Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202525-3108
Nebraska Statutory Thresholds for Settlements Involving Minors Act, how cited.

Sections 25-3108 to 25-3110 shall be known and cited as the Nebraska Statutory Thresholds for Settlements Involving Minors Act.

Laws 2025, LB341, § 1.